Washington statutes.
RCW 35.77.015

Provisions for bicycle paths, lanes, routes, roadways and improvements to be included in annual revision or extension of comprehensive street programs—Exception.

The annual revision and extension of comprehensive street programs pursuant to RCW 35.77.010 shall include consideration of and, wherever reasonably practicable, provisions for bicycle routes: PROVIDED, That no provision need be made for any such route where the cost of establishing it would be excessively disproportionate to the need or probable use.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 141 s 11.]